sl-SI: Vključene funkcije orodja: Imbus ključ; Odpirač za steklenice; Orodje za gonilni ležaj; Glava tlačilke na CO₂; Orodje za odstranjevanje kasete; Orodje za kovičenje verige; Snemalec gonilke; Ploščati izvijač; Ključ za pedala; Križni izvijač; Ključ za napere; Orodje za snemanje pnevmatike; Momentni ključ; Ključ Torx; Orodje za jedro ventila; Drugo
nb: Verktøysfunksjoner inkludert: Unbrakonøkkel; Flaskeåpner; Kranklagerverktøy; CO₂-pumpehode; Kassettavdrager; Kjedekutter; Krankavdrager; Flat skrutrekker; Pedalnøkkel; Stjerneskrutrekker; Eikenøkkel; Dekkspak; Momentnøkkel; Torx-nøkkel; Ventilkjerneverktøy; Annet
pt-PT: Funções incluídas na ferramenta: Chave sextavada/Allen; Abre-cápsulas; Ferramenta de eixo pedaleiro; Cabeça para bomba de CO₂; Extrator de cassete; Extrator de corrente; Extrator de manivela; Chave de fendas; Chave de pedais; Chave Phillips; Chave de raios; Desmonta-pneus; Chave dinamométrica; Chave Torx; Ferramenta para válvula; Outro
el: Περιλαμβανόμενες λειτουργίες εργαλείων: Κλειδί Allen/εξαγωνικό; Ανοιχτήρι μπουκαλιών; Εργαλείο μεσαίας τριβής; Κεφαλή τρόμπας CO₂; Εξωλκέας κασέτας; Κόφτης αλυσίδας; Εξωλκέας δισκοβραχίονα; Πλακέ κατσαβίδι; Κλειδί πεταλιών; Σταυροκατσάβιδο (Phillips); Ακτινολόγος; Λεβιές ελαστικών; Δυναμόκλειδο; Κλειδί Torx; Εργαλείο πυρήνα βαλβίδας; Άλλο
pt-BR: Ferramenta funções incluídas: Chave allen/hexagonal; Abridor de garrafas; Chave de movimento central; Bico inflador de CO₂; Extrator de cassete; Extrator de corrente; Extrator de pedivela; Chave de fenda; Chave de pedal; Chave phillips; Chave de raio; Espátula para pneu; Torquímetro; Chave torx; Ferramenta para núcleo de válvula; Outros
de: Enthaltene Werkzeugfunktionen: Inbus-/Sechskantschlüssel; Flaschenöffner; Tretlagerwerkzeug; CO₂-Pumpenkopf; Kassettenabzieher; Kettennieter; Kurbelabzieher; Schlitzschraubendreher; Pedalschlüssel; Kreuzschlitzschraubendreher; Speichenschlüssel; Reifenheber; Drehmomentschlüssel; Torx-Schlüssel; Ventilwerkzeug; Sonstige
it: Funzioni dello strumento incluse: Chiave a brugola/esagonale; Apribottiglie; Estrattore per movimento centrale; Erogatore CO₂; Estrattore per cassetta; Smagliacatena; Estrattore per pedivella; Cacciavite a taglio; Chiave per pedali; Cacciavite a croce (Phillips); Tiraraggi; Leva cacciagomme; Chiave dinamometrica; Chiave Torx; Estrattore per valvola; Altro
zh-TW: 包含工具功能: 內六角扳手; 開瓶器; BB 中軸工具; CO₂ 打氣筒氣嘴; 飛輪拆卸器; 打鏈器; 曲柄拆卸工具; 一字螺絲起子; 踏板扳手; 十字螺絲起子; 輻條扳手; 挖胎棒; 扭力扳手; 星型扳手; 氣門芯工具; 其他
nl: Gereedschap meegeleverde functies: Inbussleutel; Flesopener; Trapassleutel; CO₂-pompkop; Cassette-afnemer; Kettingpons; Cranktrekker; Platte schroevendraaier; Pedaalsleutel; Kruiskopschroevendraaier; Spaaksleutel; Bandenlichter; Momentsleutel; Torxsleutel; Ventielkerngereedschap; Overige
lt-LT: Įtrauktos įrankio funkcijos: Šešiakampis raktas; Butelių atidarytuvas; Miniklio veleno įrankis; CO₂ pompos galvutė; Kasetės nuėmėjas; Grandinės iškalėjas; Švaistiklių nuėmėjas; Plokščias atsuktuvas; Pedalų raktas; Kryžminis atsuktuvas; Stipinų raktas; Padangų mentelė; Dinamometrinis raktas; „Torx“ raktas; Ventilio šerdies įrankis; Kita
vi: Bao gồm các chức năng của công cụ: Lục giác; Dụng cụ mở nắp chai; Dụng cụ tháo trục giữa; Đầu van bơm CO₂; Dụng cụ tháo líp; Dụng cụ cắt sên; Dụng cụ cảo đùi đĩa; Tua vít dẹp; Cờ lê tháo pedal; Tua vít bake; Cờ lê rút căm; Dụng cụ nạy lốp; Cờ lê lực; Cờ lê Torx; Dụng cụ tháo lõi van; Khác
ru: Входящие функции инструмента: Шестигранный ключ (Allen); Открывалка для бутылок; Съёмник каретки; Насадка для баллонов CO₂; Съёмник кассеты; Выжимка цепи; Съёмник шатунов; Плоская отвёртка; Педальный ключ; Крестовая отвёртка; Спицевой ключ; Монтажка для шин; Динамометрический ключ; Ключ Torx; Ключ для ниппеля; Другое
ro-RO: Funcții ale sculelor incluse: Cheie imbus/hexagonală; Desfăcător de sticle; Cheie pentru monobloc; Cap de umflare cu CO₂; Cheie pentru pinioane; Presă de lanț; Extractor de braț pedalier; Șurubelniță plată; Cheie pentru pedale; Șurubelniță în cruce (Phillips); Cheie pentru spițe; Levier pentru anvelope; Cheie dinamometrică; Cheie Torx; Cheie pentru ventil; Altele
ja: ツール機能: 六角レンチ; 栓抜き; ボトムブラケットツール; 二酸化炭素インフレーターヘッド; カセットリムーバー; チェーンカッター; クランクエクストラクター; マイナスドライバー; ペダルレンチ; プラスドライバー; スポークレンチ; タイヤレバー; トルクレンチ; トルクスレンチ; バルブコアツール; その他
fr: Fonctions incluses: Clé Allen/hexagonale; Décapsuleur; Outil pour boîtier de pédalier; Tête de gonflage au CO₂; Démonte-cassette; Dérive-chaîne; Extracteur de manivelle; Tournevis plat; Clé à pédale; Tournevis cruciforme; Clé à rayon; Démonte-pneu; Clé dynamométrique; Clé Torx; Démonte-obus de valve; Autre
en: Tool functions included: Allen/Hex wrench; Bottle opener; Bottom bracket tool; CO₂ inflator head; Cassette remover; Chain breaker; Crank extractor; Flathead screwdriver; Pedal wrench; Phillips screwdriver; Spoke wrench; Tire lever; Torque wrench; Torx wrench; Valve core tool; Other
tr: Dahil olan alet fonksiyonları: Alyan/Altıgen anahtar; Şişe açacağı; Orta göbek anahtarı; CO₂ şişirme başlığı; Ruble sökücü; Zincir sökücü; Aynakol sökücü; Düz tornavida; Pedal anahtarı; Yıldız tornavida; Akort anahtarı; Lastik levyesi; Tork anahtarı; Torx anahtar; Sibop iğnesi aleti; Diğer
sv: Medföljande verktygsfunktioner: Insexnyckel; Kapsylöppnare; Vevlagerverktyg; CO₂-pumphuvud; Kassettverktyg; Kedjebrytare; Vevavdragare; Spårmejsel; Pedalnyckel; Stjärnmejsel (Phillips); Ekernyckel; Däckavtagare; Momentnyckel; Torx-nyckel; Ventilverktyg; Övrigt
zh-CN: 包含的工具功能: 内六角扳手; 开瓶器; 中轴工具; 二氧化碳充气嘴; 飞轮拆卸器; 截链器; 曲柄拆卸器; 一字螺丝刀; 脚踏扳手; 十字螺丝刀; 辐条扳手; 撬胎棒; 扭矩扳手; 梅花扳手; 气门芯工具; 其他
fi: Sisältyvät työkalutoiminnot: Kuusiokoloavain; Pullonavaaja; Keskiötyökalu; CO₂-täyttöpää; Pakan irrotustyökalu; Ketjunkatkaisin; Kammen ulosvetäjä; Talttapäämeisseli; Poljinavain; Ristipäämeisseli; Pinna-avain; Rengasrauta; Momenttiavain; Torx-avain; Venttiilityökalu; Muu
ko: 포함된 공구 기능: 앨런/육각 렌치; 병따개; 바텀 브래킷 공구; CO₂ 인플레이터 헤드; 카세트 리무버; 체인 브레이커; 크랭크 익스트랙터; 일자 드라이버; 페달 렌치; 십자 드라이버; 스포크 렌치; 타이어 레버; 토크 렌치; 토크스 렌치; 밸브 코어 공구; 기타
sk-SK: Funkcie nástroja zahrnuté: Imbusový kľúč; Otvárač na fľaše; Kľúč na stredové zloženie; Hlavica na bombičky CO₂; Sťahovák kazety; Nitovač reťaze; Sťahovák kľúk; Plochý skrutkovač; Kľúč na pedále; Krížový skrutkovač; Centrovací kľúč; Montážna páka; Momentový kľúč; Kľúč Torx; Kľúč na ventily; Iné
es: Funciones de la herramienta incluidas: Llave Allen/hexagonal; Abridor de botellas; Herramienta de eje de pedalier; Cabezal de inflado de CO₂; Extractor de cassette; Tronchacadenas; Extractor de bielas; Destornillador de cabeza plana; Llave de pedales; Destornillador Phillips; Llave de radios; Desmontador de neumáticos; Llave dinamométrica; Llave Torx; Llave para obús de válvula; Otro
pl: Funkcje narzędzi w zestawie: Klucz imbusowy/sześciokątny; Otwieracz do butelek; Klucz do suportu; Głowica pompki CO₂; Klucz do kasety; Skuwacz do łańcucha; Ściągacz do korby; Wkrętak płaski; Klucz do pedałów; Wkrętak krzyżakowy; Klucz do szprych; Łyżka do opon; Klucz dynamometryczny; Klucz Torx; Klucz do rdzeni zaworów; Inne
hu: Tartalmazott Functions: Imbuszkulcs; Sörnyitó; Középcsapágy-szerelő; CO₂-felfújófej; Fogaskoszorú-leszedő; Láncbontó; Hajtókar-leszedő; Lapos csavarhúzó; Pedálkulcs; Csillagcsavarhúzó; Küllőkulcs; Gumileszedő; Nyomatékkulcs; Torx-kulcs; Szeleptű-kiszedő; Egyéb
hr-HR: Uključene značajke alata: Imbus-ključ; Otvarač za boce; Alat za osovinu pogona (bottom bracket); Glava pumpe za CO₂; Skidač kasete; Alat za rastavljanje lanca; Izvlakač pogona; Ravni odvijač; Ključ za pedale; Križni odvijač (Phillips); Ključ za žbice; Poluga za gume; Momentni ključ; Torx ključ; Alat za jezgru ventila; Ostalo
bg-BG: Включени функции на инструмента: Шестограм; Отварячка за бутилки; Инструмент за средно движение; Накрайник за CO₂ помпа; Инструмент за касета; Инструмент за верига; Инструмент за курбели; Плоска отвертка; Ключ за педали; Кръстата отвертка; Ключ за спици; Щанга за гуми; Динамометричен ключ; Торкс ключ (Torx); Инструмент за игли на вентили; Друго
da: Inkluderede værktøjsfunktioner: Unbrakonøgle; Flaskeåbner; Krankboksværktøj; CO₂-pumpehoved; Kassetteaftrækker; Kædesprænger; Krankaftrækker; Fladhovedet skruetrækker; Pedalnøgle; Stjerneskruetrækker; Egernøgle; Dækjern; Momentnøgle; Torxnøgle; Værktøj til ventilkerne; Andet
cs: Obsažené funkce nářadí: Inbusový klíč; Otvírák na lahve; Klíč na středové složení; Hlavice na bombičky CO₂; Stahovák na kazety; Nýtovač řetězu; Stahovák na kliky; Plochý šroubovák; Klíč na pedály; Křížový šroubovák (Phillips); Centrklíč; Montážní páka; Momentový klíč; Klíč Torx; Klíč na ventily; Jiné
th: Functions ของเครื่องมือประกอบด้วย: ประแจแอล/หกเหลี่ยม; ที่เปิดขวด; เครื่องมือถอดกะโหลก; หัวสูบหลอดคาร์บอนไดออกไซด์; เครื่องมือถอดเฟือง; เครื่องมือตัดโซ่; ตัวดูดขาจาน; ไขควงปากแบน; ประแจขันบันได; ไขควงหัวแฉก; ประแจขันซี่ลวด; ที่งัดยาง; ประแจปอนด์; ประแจดาว; เครื่องมือขันศรวาล์ว; อื่นๆ